Hawaii statutes.
§385-13 Administration; other sections
applicable. For the purposes of this chapter, sections 383-91, 383-92,
383-95, 383-96, and 383-98 to 383-103 shall apply, mutatis mutandis, to the
administration of this chapter. [L 1961, c 157, pt of §1; Supp, §93B-14; HRS
§385-13]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next